Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4519.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 64, article 8, section 11, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Expiration. The authority to make transfers under subdivision 1 expires December 31, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2031new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Fridley and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end